Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Revisor’s notes. —

The provisions of this title were redrafted in 1984 to remove personal pronouns pursuant to § 4, ch. 58, SLA 1982 and in 1984, 1990, 1995, 2008, and 2016 to make other, minor word changes.

For a review of the sources of some of Alaska law, see Brown, The Sources of the Alaska and Oregon Codes (pts. 1 and 2), 2 UCLA — Alaska L. Rev. 15, 87 (1972-1973).

Collateral references. —

Isidore Silver, Police Civil Liability (Matthew Bender).

Cook and Sobieski, Civil Rights Actions (Matthew Bender).

Rudstein, Erlinder, and Thomas, Criminal Constitutional Law (Matthew Bender).

Erickson, George, and Tymkovich, United States Supreme Court Cases and Comments: Criminal Law and Procedure (Matthew Bender).

Thomas P. Mauriello, Criminal Investigation Handbook (Matthew Bender).